Utah statutes.
31A-41-302.   Department's authority to act upon receipt of petition.
(1)  Upon receipt of a petition required by Section 31A-41-301, the department
may answer, initiate review proceedings of its own, or appear in any
proceeding:
(a)  in the name of the defendant to the action; or
(b)  on behalf of the fund.
(2)  Subject to court approval, the department may compromise a claim on the
basis of an application of the person who files the petition.
